tools/nvda/louis/tables/es-g2.ctb
contraction lg
word largo 123-1245
word lejos 123-245
contraction lu
sufword lugar 123-136
word luego 123-1256
word luegos 123-1256-234

# letter m

contraction ma
prfword madre 134-1
prfword medio 134-145
always mediante 134-145-2345
sufword mejor 134-245
contraction mm
word mismo 134-134
word manera 134-1345
word menos 134-234
sufword mujer 134-136
sufword mayor 134-13456
word mayoría 134-13456-1235
word mientras 134-356

# letter n

word nunca 1345-14
word necesario 1345-14-1235
sufword necesidad 1345-14-1456
word nadie 1345-145
word ningún 1345-1245
word ninguna 1345-1245-1
word ninguno 1345-1245-135
sufword natural 1345-2345
word naturaleza 1345-2345-1356
word naturalidad 1345-2345-1456
word nuevo 1345-1236
sufword novedad 1345-1236-1456
prfword nada 1345-1456
word niño 1345-12456
word nuestro 1345-1256

# letter o

sufword oficio 135-124
sufword oficial 135-124-123
word oportuno 135-1234
sufword oportunidad 135-1234-1456
word otro 135-356
word ocasión 135-3456

# letter p

word padre 1234-1
contraction pc
word poco 1234-14
word podía 1234-145 
word podían 1234-145-1345
sufword persona 1234-1345
word personalidad 1234-1345-1456
word porque 1234-12345
word poder 1234-1235
word pequeño 1234-12456
word puede 1234-1256

# letter q

word quien 12345-1345

# letter r

word relación 1235-123
word relativo 1235-123-1236
word relatividad 1235-123-1236-1456
word relatividades 1235-123-1236-1456-1246
word razón 1235-1356

# letter s

word sido 234-145
prfword siguiente 234-1245
word solo 234-123
word sino 234-1345
word superior 234-1234
word superioridad 234-1234-1456
word siquiera 234-12345
word sitio 234-2345
word situación 234-2345-3456
word suyo 234-13456

# letter t

word también 2345-12
word todo 2345-145
word tenía 2345-1345
word tenido 2345-1345-145
word tenían 2345-1345-1345
word tiempo 2345-1234
word tampoco 2345-1234-14
sufword temporal 2345-1234-123
word tener 2345-1235
word tanto 2345-2345
contraction tv
word todavía 2345-1236
word tuyo 2345-13456

# letter v

word veces 1236-14
word vida 1236-145
prfword verdad 1236-1456
word vuestro 1236-1256

# letter x

sufword exterior 1346-1235

# u acute

word único 23456-14
word último 23456-123

# misc symbols

word arriba 16-1235
sufword anterior 146-1235
sufword anterioridad 146-1235-1456
word antes 146-234
word adelante 1456-123
word además 1456-134
word estaba 1246-12
word  estaban 1246-12-1345
word estado 1246-145
word están 1246-1345
word estando 1246-1345-145
word estar 1246-1235
word está 1246-2345
word estuvo 1246-1236
sufword abajo 2-345
word breve 23-1236
word  brevedad 23-1236-1456
word condición 25-145-3456
word conmigo 25-134
word consigo 25-234
word consecuencia 25-234-14
prfword consecuente 25-324-2345
word contigo 25-2345
prfword contra 25-356
word contrario 25-356-1235
word  contrariedad 25-356-1235-1456
word encima 26-14
word entonces 26-2345
word principio 235-14
word principal 235-14-123
word propio 235-1234
sufword propiedad 235-1234-1456
word pronto 235-2345
sufword hacía 236-14
word hacían 236-14-1345
sufword hacer 236-1235
sufword inferior 35-124
sufword inferioridad 35-124-1456
word inmediato 35-134
sufword interior 35-1235
sufword interioridad 35-1235-1456
word interés 35-2345
word interesante 35-2345-2345
word trabajo 356-12
word trabajar 356-12-1235
word trabajador 356-12-156
word entretanto 356-2345
word numeroso 3456-234
word ahora 4-125
word mucho 4-134
word nosotros 45-1345
word vosotros 45-1236
word importancia 345-1234-14
word importante 345-1234-2345
word sus 345-234

# plurals, common derivatives and accentuations for every one of these words when needed

word absolutos 1-12-246
word absolutas 1-12-246
word absolutamente 1-12-134
word acciones 1-3456-1246
word accionando 1-3456-146-145
word bajos 12-245-246
word bajas 12-245-12346
word bajes 12-245-1246
word buenos 12-1345-246
word buenas 12-1345-12346
word buenamente 12-1345-134
word bastantes 12-2345-1246
word bondades 12-1456-1246
word cercas 14-14-12346
word ciegas 14-1245-12346
word ciegos 14-1245-246
word ciegamente 14-1245-134
word cierta 14-2345-1
word ciertas 14-2345-12346
prfword ciertos 14-2345-246
word ciertamente 14-2345-134
word concierto 25-14-2345
word cuales 14-123-1246
word cuál 5-14-123
word cuáles 5-14-123-1246
word cuánto 5-14-136
word cuántos 5-14-136-246
word cuántas 5-14-136-12346
word cuantas 14-136-12346
word cuantos 14-136-246
word cuya 14-13456-1
word cuyas 14-13456-12346
word cuyos 14-13456-246
word dónde 5-145-145
prfword diferencias 145-124-14-12346
prfword diferentes 145-124-2345-1246
word demasiados 145-134-145-246
word demasiadas 145-134-145-12346
word efectos 15-124-246
word efectivos 15-124-1236-246
word efectivas 15-124-1236-12346
word efectiva 15-124-1236-a
word efectivamente 15-124-1236-134
word ejemplos 15-245-246
word favores 124-1236-1246
word grandes 1245-145-1246
word hijos 125-245-246
word hijas 125-245-12346
word hermanos 125-134-246
word hermanas 125-134-12346
word hermana 125-134-1
word hermanastra 125-134-1-234-356-1
word hermanastro 125-134-1-234-356-135
word hermanastras 125-134-1-234-356-12346
word hermanastros 125-134-1-234-356-246
word historias 125-2345-12346
word prehistoria 235-125-2345
word prehistorias 235-125-2345-12346
word hombres 125-2456-1246
word juntos 245-2345-246
word juntas 245-2345-12346
word junta 245-2345-1
word conjunto 25-245-2345
word conjuntos 25-245-2345-246
word conjuntas 25-245-2345-12346
word conjunta 25-245-2345-1
word disjuntos 256-245-2345-246
word disjuntas 256-245-2345-12346
word algunas 13-1345-12346
word algunos 13-1345-246
word largos 123-1245-246
word largas 123-1245-12346
word madres 134-1-1246
prfword medias 134-145-12346
prfword medios 134-145-246
word misma 134-134-1
word mismas 134-134-12346
word mismos 134-134-246
word maneras 134-1345-12346
word sobremanera 23-134-1345
word necesarias 1345-14-1235-12346
word necesarios 1345-14-1235-246
word necesariamente 1345-14-1235-134
word naturalezas 1345-2345-1356-12346
word nuevas 1345-1236-12346
word nuevos 1345-1236-246
word nuevamente 1345-1236-134
word niña 1345-12456-1
word niñas 1345-12456-12346
word niños 1345-12456-246
word nuestras 1345-136-12346
word nuestros 1345-136-246
sufword oficios 135-124-246
sufword extraoficial 1346-2345-1235-1-135-124-123
word oportunas 135-1234-12346
word oportunos 135-1234-246
word inoportuno 35-135-1234
word inoportunos 35-135-1234-246
sufword inoportuna 35-135-1234-1
word inoportunas 35-135-1234-12346
sufword inoportunidad 35-135-1234-1456
word jóvenes 245-1236-1246
word otras 135-356-12346
word otros 135-356-246
word ocasiones 135-3456-1246
word ocasionalmente 135-3456-13-134
word padres 1234-1-1246
word compadre 36-1234-1-1246
word compadres 36-1234-1-1246
word poca 1234-14-1
word pocas 1234-14-12346
word pocos 1234-14-246
word personas 1234-1345-12346
word pequeña 1234-12456-1
word pequeñas 1234-12456-12346
word pequeños 1234-12456-246
word pequeñez 1234-12456-15-1356
word pequeñeces 1234-12456-15-14-1246
word pueden 1234-1256-1345
word puedes 1234-1256-234
prfword quién 5-12345-1345
word relaciones 1235-123-1246
word relacionando 1235-123-146-145
word relativa 1235-123-1236-1
word relativas 1235-123-1236-12346
word relativos 1235-123-1236-246
word relativamente 1235-123-1236-1-134
word razones 1235-1356-1246
prfword razon 1235-1356
prfword siguientes 234-1245-1246
word solos 234-123-246
word solas 234-123-12346
word sólamente 234-123-1-134
word sola 234-123-1
word sitios 234-2345-246
word situaciones 234-2345-3456-1246
word suyas 234-13456-12346
word suyos 234-13456-246
word todas 2345-145-12346
word todos 2345-145-246
word sobretodo 23-2345-145
word contenía 25-2345-1345
word contenían 25-2345-1345-1345
word entretenía 356-2345-1345
word entretenían 356-2345-1345-1345
word retenía 1235-2345-1345
word retenían 1235-2345-1345-1345
word entretiempo 356-2345-1234
word tiempos 2345-1234-246
word entretiempos 356-2345-1234-246
word sobretiempo 23-2345-1234
word contener 25-2345-1235
word entretener 356-2345-1235
word tuyas 2345-13456-12346
word tuyos 2345-13456-246
word convida 25-1236-145
word convidas 25-1236-145-12346
word vidas 1236-145-12346
word vuestras 1236-1256-12346
word vuestros 1236-1256-246
word única 23456-14-1
word únicamente 23456-14-1-134
word únicas 23456-14-12346
word únicos 23456-14-246
word última 23456-123-1
word últimamente 23456-123-1-134
word últimas 23456-123-12346
word últimos 23456-123-246
word brevemente 23-1236-134
word breves 23-1236-1246
word brevedades 23-1236-1456-1246
word condiciones 25-145-3456-1246
word condicionalmente 25-145-3456-13-134
word incondicionalmente 35-25-145-3456-13-134
word consecuencias 25-234-14-12346
word principios 235-14-246
word propia 235-1234-1
word propiamente 235-1234-1-134
word propias 235-1234-12346
word propios 235-1234-246
word inmediatamente 35-134-1-134
word inmediatas 35-134-12346
word inmediata 35-134-1
word inmediatos 35-134-246
word inmediatez 35-134-15-1356
word intereses 35-2345-1246
word interesantemente 35-2345-2345-134
word interesantes 35-2345-2345-1246
word trabajas 356-12-12346
word trabajos 356-12-246
word numerosos 3456-246-246
word numerosas 3456-246-12346
word muchas 4-134-12346
word muchos 4-134-246
word nosotras 45-1345-12346
word vosotras 45-1236-12346
word importancias 345-1234-14-12346
word importantes 345-1234-2345-1246
word quienes 12345-1345-1246
word quiénes 5-12345-1345-1246
word quién 5-12345-1345

# general syllabic contractions

# Some rules to some contractions, starting with the x (contraction for on) should always
# go after consonants, not vowels.  For this a class definition is used to group all
# consonants. Potential back translation issue here.

attribute consonants BbCcDdFfGgHhJjKkLlMmNnPpQqRrSsTtVvWwXxYyZzÑñ
after consonants always on 1346
# same applies to ion
after consonants always ion 3456
# The u e contraction may never be used after the letter g, avoids confussion with u
# diaeresis which is part of many words. More classes.
attribute euvowels Gg
after euvowels always eu 15-136
after euvowels always EU 15-136

# only exception to this contraction, avoids confussion with the Spanish comma at end of words

partword ad 1456
partword al 13
partword an 146
partword ar 16
partword as 12346
partword em 126
partword es 1246
partword im 345
partword ion 3456
partword om 2456
partword or 156
partword os 246
partword qu 12345
partword ue 1256

# word endings, including plurals. Some are formed using ES, others just the letter S.

prfword acción 1-3456
endword acciónes 1-3456-1246
endword ando 146-145
endword andos 146-145-234
endword ección 15-3456
endword ecciones 15-3456-1246
endword endo 26-145
endword endos 26-145-234
endword icción 24-3456
endword icciones 24-3456-1246
endword iendo 256-145
endword ión 3456
endword iones 3456-1246
endword mente 134
endword mentes 134-234
endword que 12345
endword ques 12345-234
endword ucción 136-3456
endword ucciones 136-3456-1246

# Word beginnings may not be followed by vowels (to avoid confussion with punctuation
# signs), including accented ones. More classes follow.
attribute vowels AaEeIiOoUuÁáÉéÍíÓóÚúÜü

# Setting the exceptions, though note that this will not work when back translating but it
# willb e needed in a few cases.
before vowels begword com 14-2456
before vowels begword con 14-1346
before vowels begword dis 145-24-234
before vowels begword entre 35-356-15
before vowels begword ex 15-1346
before vowels begword inter 35-2345-236
before vowels begword pre 1234-1235-15
before vowels begword re 1235-15
before vowels begword sobre 234-135-23-15

# word beginnings

begword com 36
begword con 25
begword dis 256
begword entre 356
begword ex 1346
begword inter 13456
begword pre 235
begword re 1235
begword sobre 23

# The consonant which follows a word beginning may not be contracted. Not many exceptions so setting them one by one.
